Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-315
Notary public not required to register.

Nothing in the Electronic Notary Public Act requires a notary public to register as an electronic notary public if he or she does not perform electronic notarial acts.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 15.